District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.02

Trustee powers.

A trustee may exercise:

(1)

Powers conferred by the governing instrument;

(2)

Except as limited by the governing instrument, any other powers necessary or convenient to carry out the activities and affairs of the statutory trust; and

(3)

Other powers conferred by this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(6)(B), 59 DCR 13171

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business” in (2).

Effect of Amendments

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 502 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.